Illinois, session 104th, HB4399.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 12-705.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/12-705.1)7    Sec. 12-705.1. Required use of biodiesel by certain 8vehicles.9    (a) Beginning July 1, 2006, any diesel powered vehicle 10owned or operated by this State, any county or unit of local 11government, any school district, any community college or 12public college or university, or any mass transit agency must, 13when refueling at a bulk central fueling facility, use a 14biodiesel blend that contains 5% biodiesel, as those terms are 15defined in the Illinois Renewable Fuels Development Program 16Act, where available, unless the engine is designed or 17retrofitted to operate on a higher percentage of biodiesel or 18on ultra low sulfur fuel.19    (a-1) Beginning July 1, 2027, any diesel powered vehicle 20owned or operated by this State, any county or unit of local 21government, any school district, any community college or 22public college or university, or any mass transit agency must 23use a biodiesel blend that contains 19%, as those terms are   HB4399- 2 -LRB104 17513 LNS 30940 b1defined in the Illinois Renewable Fuels Development Program 2Act, where available, unless the engine is designed or 3retrofitted to operate on a higher percentage of biodiesel or 4on ultra low sulfur fuel. In December, January, February, and 5March, a biodiesel blend of at least 10% may be used. 6    (b) Nothing in this Section prohibits any unit of 7government from using a biodiesel blend containing more than 82% biodiesel.9    (c) As used in this Section, a "bulk central fueling 10facility" means a non-commercial fueling facility whose 11primary purpose is the fueling of vehicles owned or operated 12by the State, a county or unit of local government, a school 13district, a community college or public college or university, 14or a mass transit agency.15    (d) The Secretary of Transportation shall adopt rules for 16implementing this Section. 17(Source: P.A. 96-281, eff. 8-11-09.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.